Utah statutes.
62A-4a-119.   Division required to produce "family impact statement" with regard to rules.

Beginning May 1, 2000, whenever the division establishes a rule, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, those processes shall include an assessment of the impact of that rule on families.  Those assessments shall determine the impact of the rule on the authority of parents to oversee the care, supervision, upbringing, and education of children in the parents' custody.  The division shall publish a family impact statement describing those assessments and determinations, within 90 days of the establishment of each rule.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

